California, session 20252026, SB806.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 108 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:108. Each of the boards comprising board within the department exists as a separate unit, and has the functions of setting standards, holding meetings, and setting dates thereof, preparing and conducting examinations, passing upon applicants, conducting investigations of violations of laws under its jurisdiction, issuing citations and holding hearings for the revocation of licenses, and the imposing of penalties following those hearings, insofar as these powers are given by statute to each respective board.